Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-137, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 78, O.S.L. 2024 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-137), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-137. As used in the Uniform Military and Overseas
Voters Act:
1. "Covered voter" means:
a. a uniformed-service voter or an overseas voter who is
registered to vote in this state,
Req. No. 16206 Page 1

b. a uniformed-service voter defined in subparagraph a of
paragraph 9 of this section, whose voting residence is
in this state and who otherwise satisfies this state's
voter eligibility requirements,
c. an overseas voter who, before leaving the United
States with an intent to return, was a bona fide
resident of Oklahoma and last eligible to vote in this
state and, except for a state residency requirement,
otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility
requirements, or
d. an overseas voter who, before leaving the United
States with an intent to return and was a bona fide
resident of Oklahoma, would have been last eligible to
vote in this state had the voter then been of voting
age and, except for a state residency requirement,
otherwise satisfies this state's voter eligibility
requirements, or
e. an overseas voter who was born outside the United
States, is not described in subparagraph c or d of
this paragraph, and, except for a state residency
requirement, otherwise satisfies this state's voter
eligibility requirements, if:
(1) the last place where a parent or legal guardian
of the voter was, or under the Uniform Military
Req. No. 16206 Page 2

and Overseas Voters Act would have been, eligible
to vote before leaving the United States is
within this state, and
(2) the voter has not previously registered to vote
in any other state;
2. "Dependent" means an individual recognized as a dependent by
a uniformed service;
3. "Federal postcard application" means the application
prescribed under Section 101(b)(2) of the Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff(b)(2);
4. "Federal write-in absentee ballot" means the ballot
described in Section 103 of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens
Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff-2;
5. "Military-overseas ballot" means:
a. a federal write-in absentee ballot,
b. a ballot specifically prepared or distributed for use
by a covered voter in accordance with Section 14-136
et seq. of this title, or
c. a ballot cast by a covered voter in accordance with
the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act;
6. "Overseas voter" means a United States citizen who is
outside the United States;
7. "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
Req. No. 16206 Page 3

terr itory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States;
8. "Uniformed service" means:
a. active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air
Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of
the United States,
b. the Merchant Marine, the commissioned corps of the
Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of
the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of
the United States, or
c. the National Guard and state militia;
9. "Uniformed-service voter" means an individual who is
qualified to vote and is:
a. a member of the active or reserve components of the
Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or
Coast Guard of the United States who is on active
duty,
b. a member of the Merchant Marine, the commissioned
corps of the Public Health Service, or the
commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration of the United States,
c. a member on activated status of the National Guard or
state militia, or

Req. No. 16206 Page 4

d. a spouse or dependent of a member referred to in this
paragraph; and
10. "United States", used in the territorial sense, means the
several states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United
States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16206 MJ 02/10/26















Req. No. 16206 Page 5